Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1525.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
BLUE ECONOMY TASK FORCE
SECTION 1. (1) The Blue Economy Task Force is established.
(2) The task force consists of no fewer than 13 members appointed as follows:
(a)(A) The President of the Senate shall appoint one member from among the members
of the Senate.
(B) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(C) Of the members appointed under this paragraph, at least one shall be a member of
the coastal caucus.
(b) The President and the Speaker shall jointly appoint not fewer than 10 members to
represent:
(A) Public and private research institutions;
(B) Businesses innovating in blue economy sectors;
(C) Commercial and noncommercial fishery businesses;
(D) Recreational activities other than fishing;
(E) The tourism industry;
(F) Environmental organizations;
(G) Equity investors in blue economy businesses;
(H) Coastal labor;
(I) The Sea Grant College of Oregon State University; and
(J) Federally recognized Indian tribes located on the Oregon coast.
(c) The chair of the Ocean Policy Advisory Council, or the chair’s designee, shall serve
as a member of the task force.
(3)(a) The task force shall study and prepare a report on:
(A) The sectors of Oregon’s blue economy;
(B) Existing economic development plans or strategies for the blue economy; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1525 (SB 1525-A) Page 1

(C) Opportunities for the State of Oregon to facilitate or enhance the growth of
sustainable blue economy businesses while preserving and protecting Oregon’s coastal
ecosystems.
(b) The report must include:
(A) Identification and synthesis of existing state or regional studies, market analyses and
federal and state programs relevant to the blue economy in Oregon.
(B) Identification of existing state and local initiatives, including workforce programs,
efforts by research centers, efforts by ports, grant programs and permitting pathways, to
determine where existing efforts overlap, could be expanded to fill in gaps and present op-
portunities to be integrated into a unified strategic plan.
(C) A review and evaluation of efforts conducted by other states or countries to identify
best practices and policies to build sustainable innovation in the blue economy.
(D) Prioritized recommendations specific to subject areas that include policy, investment,
workforce development, research and development and regulatory coordination.
(E) A roadmap for implementing the recommendations of the task force that may include
the establishment of a center for the blue economy.
(4) A majority of the members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(6) The President and the Speaker shall jointly select one member of the task force to
serve as chairperson and another to serve as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the
duties and powers necessary for the performance of the functions of the offices as the
President and the Speaker determine.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report and may include recommendations for legis-
lation to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the environment, in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and to the Ocean Policy Advisory Council, no later than
September 15, 2027.
(11)(a) The Legislative Policy and Research Office shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(b) The task force, through the office, may contract for services necessary to carry out
the duties and functions of the task force.
(12) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative Assembly serve
as volunteers on the task force and, unless they are qualified members, as defined in ORS
292.495, are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(14) All appointments to the task force made under subsection (2) of this section must
be completed no later than 60 days after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(15) The task force shall have its first meeting no later than 90 days after the effective
date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on December 31, 2027.
OREGON OCEAN SCIENCE TRUST
Enrolled Senate Bill 1525 (SB 1525-A) Page 2

SECTION 3. Pursuant to ORS 196.566, the Oregon Ocean Science Trust may create and
maintain an entity that is exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, as amended, for the purpose of advancing the mission of the trust.
CAPTIONS AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 4, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by House March 5, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1525 (SB 1525-A) Page 3